South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4014.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Constituent districts of Charleston County School District SECTION 1.    Notwithstanding another provision of law, the constituent districts of Charleston County School District and their respective boards of trustees are abolished effective July 1, 2025. On July 1, 2025, the constituent districts cease to exist and from that date, all of the powers, duties, and functions now devolved by Act 340 of 1967, as amended, upon the boards of trustees of the constituent districts are assumed and exercised by the Board of Trustees of Charleston County School District. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 24th day of April, 2025. Approved the 28th day of April, 2025. __________